Arkansas, session 2025, SB40.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Bureau of Legislative Research of the Legislative Council for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q030U DIRECTOR, BUREAU OF LEGIS RESEARCH 1 GRADE EXE04
(2) Q302C DEPUTY DIRECTOR 3 GRADE EXE03
(3) Q303C BLR CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE EXE03
*JAR016*
04-07-2025 16:59:44 JAR016

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB40
(4) Q304C BLR CHIEF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY OFFICER 1 GRADE IST14
(5) Q305C BLR CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER 1 GRADE EXE02
(6) Q306C LEGAL RES & DRAFTING CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE EXE02
(7) Q307C ADMINISTRATIVE RULES CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE EXE02
(8) Q308C STATUTORY REVIEW CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE EXE02
(9) Q309C LEGISLATIVE PERSONNEL ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE SPC10
(10) Q310C LEGISLATIVE BUDGET ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE SPC10
(11) Q311C LEGISLATIVE PROGRAMMER ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE IST13
(12) Q312C LEGISLATIVE NETWORK ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE IST13
(13) Q313C RESEARCH & POLICY ANALYSIS ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE SPC10
(14) Q314C COMMITTEE SERVICES ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE SPC10
(15) Q315C LEGISLATIVE APPLICATIONS EXPERT 5 GRADE IST11
(16) Q316C LEGISLATIVE IT INFRASTRUCTURE EXPERT 4 GRADE IST11
(17) Q317C LEGISLATIVE WEBSITE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IST07
(18) Q318C LEGISLATIVE USER IT EXPERT 5 GRADE IST05
(19) Q319C LEGISLATIVE DATA SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IST05
(20) Q320C LEGISLATIVE MEDIA ENGINEER 1 GRADE IST04
(21) Q272C LEGISLATIVE ECONOMIST 2 GRADE SPC08
(22) Q321C LEGISLATIVE ATTORNEY III 23 GRADE SPC08
(23) Q322C LEGISLATIVE EDITOR COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SPC06
(24) Q323C LEGISLATIVE STATE BUDGET EXPERT 10 GRADE SPC06
(25) Q324C LEGISLATIVE STATE PERSONNEL EXPERT 5 GRADE SPC06
(26) Q325C LEGISLATIVE EDITOR LEAD 7 GRADE SPC04
(27) Q326C LEGISLATIVE RESEARCH LEAD 7 GRADE SPC04
(28) Q327C LEGISLATIVE COMMITTEE LEAD 10 GRADE SGS10
(29) Q328C LEGISLATIVE ADMIN SERVICES SR. ANALYST 3 GRADE SGS09
(30) Q329C LEGISLATIVE HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 1 GRADE SGS08
(31) Q330C LEGISLATIVE EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT 1 GRADE SGS08
(32) Q331C LEGISLATIVE ADMINISTRATIVE ASST III 4 GRADE SGS06
(33) Q110C LEGISLATIVE ADMINISTRATIVE ASST II 8 GRADE SGS05
(34) Q332C LEGISLATIVE INVENTORY/FACILITIES SPEC 1 GRADE SGS04
(35) Q128C LEGISLATIVE ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT 16 GRADE SGS04
(36) Q333C LEGISLATIVE ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE SGS03
(37) Q065C OFFICE SERVICES SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE SGS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 134

04-07-2025 16:59:44 JAR016

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB40
SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Bureau of Legislative Research of the Legislative Council for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: thirty-one (31) temporary or part-time employees,
when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Bureau of Legislative Research of the Legislative Council, to be
payable from the State Central Services Fund, for personal services,
operating expenses, contingency, committee rooms, and construction and
capital improvements of the Bureau of Legislative Research and the
Legislative Council for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $11,860,244
(02) EXTRA HELP 150,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 3,827,527
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 2,083,686
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 218,002
(C) PROF. FEES 298,889
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 400,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) CONSTRUCTION/CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 50,000
(06) CONTINGENCY 3,393,480
(07) COMMITTEE ROOMS 205,063
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $22,486,891

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - INTERIM COMMITTEE STUDY EXPENSES. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Bureau of Legislative Research of the Legislative
Council Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the State Central Services
Fund, for study expenses of the Committees of the Arkansas General Assembly
04-07-2025 16:59:44 JAR016

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB40
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) INTERIM COMMITTEE STUDY EXPENSES $271,060

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - INTERIM COMMITTEE EXPENSES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Bureau of Legislative Research of the Legislative
Council Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the State Central Services
Fund, for paying per diem, expenses and mileage to members of the Arkansas
General Assembly attending regular and special meetings and other committee
related activities of the Committees of the Arkansas General Assembly for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PER DIEM, EXPENSES, AND MILEAGE FOR
MEMBERS OF THE ARKANSAS GENERAL ASSEMBLY
COMMITTEES $1,449,199

SECTION 6. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
CLASSIFICATION UTILIZATION. The Bureau of Legislative Research may utilize,
at the discretion of the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research, the
following classifications as necessary. The use of these classifications
shall not be considered as increasing the number of positions authorized in
this act, only as a temporary reclassification or cross grade of a position.

CLASS
CODE TITLE GRADE
Q334C LEGISLATIVE ATTORNEY IV SPC09
Q335C LEGISLATIVE ATTORNEY II SPC05
Q336C LEGISLATIVE STATE BUDGET SENIOR ANALYST SPC05
Q337C LEGISLATIVE STATE PERSONNEL SENIOR ANALYST SPC05
Q338C LEGISLATIVE STATE BUDGET ANALYST SPC04
Q339C LEGISLATIVE STATE PERSONNEL ANALYST SPC04
04-07-2025 16:59:44 JAR016

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB40
Q340C LEGISLATIVE ATTORNEY I SPC03
Q341C LEGISLATIVE EDITOR SENIOR ANALYST SPC02
Q342C LEGISLATIVE RESEARCH SENIOR ANALYST SPC02
Q343C LEGISLATIVE EDITOR ANALYST SPC01
Q344C LEGISLATIVE STATE BUDGET SPECIALIST SPC01
Q345C LEGISLATIVE STATE PERSONNEL SPECIALIST SPC01
Q346C LEGISLATIVE RESEARCH ANALYST SPC01
Q347C LEGISLATIVE COMMITTEE SENIOR ANALYST SGS08
Q348C LEGISLATIVE HUMAN RESOURCES SPECIALIST SGS07
Q349C LEGISLATIVE EDITOR SPECIALIST SGS06
Q350C LEGISLATIVE COMMITTEE ANALYST SGS06
Q364C LEGISLATIVE RESEARCH SPECIALIST SGS06
Q365C LEGISLATIVE ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES SPEC SGS05
Q353C LEGISLATIVE COMMITTEE SPECIALIST SGS05
Q354C LEGISLATIVE IT INFRASTRUCTURE ENGINEER IST10
Q355C LEGISLATIVE APPLICATIONS COORDINATOR IST10
Q356C LEGISLATIVE IT INFRASTRUCTURE TECHNICIAN IST08
Q357C LEGISLATIVE APPLICATIONS DEVELOPER II IST08
Q358C LEGISLATIVE APPLICATIONS DEVELOPER I IST07
Q359C LEGISLATIVE PROJECT ANALYST IST07
Q360C LEGISLATIVE IT INFRASTRUCTURE SPECIALIST IST06
Q361C LEGISLATIVE USER SUPPORT LEAD IST04
Q362C LEGISLATIVE USER SUPPORT TECHNICIAN IST03
Q363C LEGISLATIVE USER SUPPORT SPECIALIST IST02

The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2025
through June 30, 2026.

SECTION 7. SPECIAL LANGUAGE - CODE AMENDMENT. Arkansas Code § 10-3-303,
concerning the Bureau of Legislative Research, is amended to add additional
subsections to read as follows:
(i) The director may direct the Chief Fiscal Officer of the state to
transfer appropriation between the following in such amounts as are
determined to be necessary:
(1) The line items within appropriations pertaining to the bureau;
and
04-07-2025 16:59:44 JAR016

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB40
(2) The appropriations made by the operative appropriation act for the
bureau.; and
(3) The appropriations for the Bureau to any other Constitutional
Officer.

SECTION 8. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 9. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 10. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

04-07-2025 16:59:44 JAR016

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB40
/s/Joint Budget Committee



































04-07-2025 16:59:44 JAR016